Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4452.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 18. An employer shall not relocate, cease, or subcontract its operations or part of its operations less than 1 year after its employees elect a bargaining representative. Sec. 23. (1) Rulings or orders promulgated by the commission shall be are reviewable only by the supreme court and on petition for writ of certiorari or such other process as may be appropriate, except as provided in this section. (2) Violations of the provisions of sections 16, 17a, 18, and 22(a) of this act only, shall be are deemed to be unfair labor practices remediable by the commission in the following manner: (a) When it is charged that any person has engaged in or is engaging in any such unfair labor practice, the commission, or any agent designated by the commission for such purposes, may issue and cause to be served upon the person a complaint stating the charges in that respect, and containing a notice of hearing before the commission or a commissioner, or before a designated agent, at a place therein fixed, not less than 5 days after the serving of the complaint. No A complaint shall issue must not be issued based upon on any unfair labor practice occurring more than 6 months prior to before the filing of the charge with the commission and the service of a copy thereof upon the person against whom the charge is made, unless the person aggrieved thereby was prevented from filing the charge by reason of service in the armed forces, in which event the 6-month period shall must be computed from the day of his the person's discharge. Any complaint may be amended by the commissioner or agent conducting the hearing or the commission, at any time prior to before the issuance of an order based thereon. The person upon whom the complaint is served may file an answer to the original or amended complaint and appear in person or otherwise and give testimony at the place and time fixed in the complaint. In the discretion of the commissioner or agent conducting the hearing or the commission, any other person may be allowed to intervene in the proceeding and to present testimony. Any proceeding shall must be conducted pursuant to in accordance with chapter 4 of Act No. 306 of the Public Acts of 1969, as amended, being sections 24.271 to 24.287 of the Michigan Compiled Laws.the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.271 to 24.288. (b) The testimony taken by the commissioner, agent or the commission shall must be reduced to writing and filed with the commission. Thereafter the commission upon notice may take further testimony or hear argument. If upon the preponderance of the testimony taken the commission is of the opinion that any person named in the complaint has engaged in or is engaging in the unfair labor practice, then it shall state its findings of fact and shall issue and cause to be served on such person an order requiring that person to cease and desist from the unfair labor practice, and to take such affirmative action including reinstatement of employees with or without back pay, as will effectuate the policies of this act. The order may further require the person to make reports from time to time showing the extent to which that person has complied with the order. If, upon the preponderance of the testimony taken the commission is not of the opinion that the person named in the complaint has engaged in or is engaging in the unfair labor practice, then the commission shall state its findings of fact and shall issue an order dismissing the complaint. No An order of the commission shall must not require the reinstatement of any individual as an employee who has been suspended or discharged, or the payment to him the individual of any back pay, if the individual was suspended or discharged for cause. If the evidence is presented before a commissioner, or before examiners thereof, the commissioner, or examiners shall issue and cause to be served on the parties to the proceeding a proposed report, together with a recommended order, which shall must be filed with the commission, and if exceptions are not filed within 20 days or earlier after service thereof upon the parties, or within such further period as the commission may authorize, the recommended order shall become becomes the order of the commission and become effective as prescribed in the order. (c) Until the record in a case has been filed in a court, the commission at any time, upon reasonable notice and in such manner as it deems proper, may modify or set aside, in whole or in part, any finding or order made or issued by it. (d) The commission or any prevailing party may petition the court of appeals for the enforcement of the order and for appropriate temporary relief or restraining order, and shall file in the court the record in the proceedings. Upon the filing of the petition, the court shall cause notice thereof to be served upon the person, and thereupon shall have jurisdiction of the proceeding and shall summarily grant such temporary or permanent relief or restraining order as it deems just and proper, enforcing, modifying, enforcing as so modified, or setting aside in whole or in part the order of the commission. No An objection that has not been urged before the commission, its commissioner or agent, shall must not be considered by the court, unless the failure or neglect to urge the objection is excused because of extraordinary circumstances. The findings of the commission with respect to questions of fact if supported by competent, material, and substantial evidence on the record considered as a whole shall be is conclusive. If either party applies to the court for leave to present additional evidence and shows to the satisfaction of the court that the additional evidence is material and that there were reasonable grounds for the failure to present it in the hearing before the commission, its commissioner or agent, the court may order the additional evidence to be taken before the commission, its commissioner or agent, and to be made a part of the record. The commission may modify its findings as to the facts, or make new findings, by reason of additional evidence so taken and filed, and it shall file the modifying or new findings, which findings with respect to questions of fact if supported by competent, material, and substantial evidence on the record considered as a whole shall be is conclusive, and shall file its recommendations, if any, for the modification or setting aside of its original order. Upon the filing of the record with it the jurisdiction of the court shall be is exclusive and its judgment and decree shall be is final, except that the same shall be is subject to review by the supreme court in accordance with the general court rules. (e) Any party aggrieved by a final order of the commission granting or denying in whole or in part the relief sought may within not later than 20 days of after such order as a matter of right obtain a review of the order in the court of appeals by filing in the court a petition praying that the order of the commission be modified or set aside, with copy of the petition filed on the commission, and thereupon the aggrieved party shall file in the court the record in the proceeding, certified by the commission. Upon the timely filing of the petition, the court shall proceed in the same manner as in the case of an application by the commission under subsection (d), and shall summarily grant to the commission or to any prevailing party such temporary relief or restraining order as it deems just and proper, enforcing, modifying, enforcing as so modified, or setting aside in whole or in part the order of the commission. The findings of the commission with respect to questions of fact if supported by competent, material, and substantial evidence on the record considered as a whole shall be are conclusive. If a timely petition for review is not filed under this subdivision by an aggrieved party, it shall be is conclusively presumed that the commission's order is supported by competent, material and substantial evidence on the record considered as a whole, and the commission or any prevailing party shall be is entitled, upon application therefor, to a summary order enforcing the commission's order. (f) The commencement of proceedings under subdivision (d) or (e), shall must not, unless specifically ordered by the court, operate as a stay of the commission's order. (g) Petitions filed under subdivisions (d) and (e) shall must be heard expeditiously by the courts to which presented, and for good cause shown shall must take precedence over all other civil matters except earlier matters of the same character. (h) The commission and/or or any charging party shall have has power, upon issuance of complaint as provided in subdivision (a) charging that any person has engaged in or is engaging in an unfair labor practice, shall have has power to petition any circuit court within any circuit where the unfair labor practice in question is alleged to have occurred or where the person resides or transacts business, for appropriate temporary relief or restraining order, in accordance with the general court rules, and the court shall have has jurisdiction to grant to the commission and/or or any charging party such temporary relief or restraining order as it deems just and proper. (i) For the purpose of all hearings and investigations, which, in the opinion of the commission, are necessary and proper for the exercise of the powers vested in it under this section, the provisions of section 11 shall be are applicable, except that subpoenas may issue as provided in section 11 without regard to whether mediation shall have been undertaken. (j) The labor relations and mediation functions of this act shall must be separately administered by the commission.